Utah statutes.
11-36a-702.   Time limitations.

(1)  A person or an entity that initiates a challenge under Subsection 11-36a-701(3)(a) may not initiate that challenge unless it is initiated within:

(a)  for a challenge under Subsection 11-36a-701(3)(a)(i)(A), 30 days after the day on which the person or entity pays the impact fee;

(b)  for a challenge under Subsection 11-36a-701(3)(a)(i)(B), 180 days after the day on which the person or entity pays the impact fee; or

(c)  for a challenge under Subsection 11-36a-701(3)(a)(ii), one year after the day on which the person or entity pays the impact fee.

(2)  The deadline to file an action in district court is tolled from the date that a challenge is filed using an administrative appeals procedure described in Section 11-36a-703 until 30 days after the day on which a final decision is rendered in the administrative appeals procedure.

